Utah statutes.
17-19a-401.   County auditor investigative powers -- Report of findings.

(1) (a)  A county auditor:

(i)  may conduct an investigation of an issue or action associated with or related to the auditor's statutory duties, including investigating a book or account of a county officer, county office, or other county entity; and

(ii)  may not conduct an investigation of an issue or action that is not associated with or related to the auditor's statutory duties.

(b)  A county officer, employee, or other county administrative entity shall grant the county auditor complete and free access to a book requested by the county auditor in accordance with Subsection (1)(a)(i).

(c)  A county auditor, with the assistance of the county or district attorney, may:

(i)  administer an oath or affirmation; or

(ii)  issue an administrative subpoena for a witness or document necessary to the performance of the auditor's statutory duties.

(2)  If the county auditor, after a complete investigation, finds that a book or account of a county officer, office, or other county administrative entity is not kept in accordance to law, or that an officer, office, or other county administrative entity has made an incorrect or improper financial report, the county auditor shall prepare a report of the auditor's findings and submit a copy of the report to the county executive.

(3)  If a county auditor, after a complete investigation, finds that a justice court judge has not kept a book or account according to law, or that the justice court judge has made an incorrect or improper financial report, the auditor shall prepare a report of the auditor's findings and submit a copy of the report to the state court administrator, the county executive, and the county legislative body.

